Wyoming, session 2025, HB0119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-517 is created to read:

1-26-517. Minimum easement standards.

(a) Each person shall comply with the requirements of
this section before acquiring any property by condemnation.
HB0119

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0385

(b) Not less than thirty (30) days before a
condemnation action is commenced under this act, the
condemnor shall give notice to the board of county
commissioners of the county and any local governing body of
a city or town in which the condemnation is to take place.

(c) Any easement established under this act shall
indicate that the original landowner is not responsible for
any liability, including vicarious liability, other than
intentional acts arising from use of the land under the
easement.

(d) The condemnor shall be responsible for
reclamation of the property after the condemnor no longer
requires the easement, pursuant to W.S. 1‑26‑714.

(e) An existing easement shall be used exclusively
for its stated purpose unless the existing easement:

(i) Contemplates a method by which an easement
can be enlarged or amended; or

HB0119

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0385
(ii) Authorizes the parties to renegotiate the
easement.

(f) For purposes of calculating compensation,
improvements to the property shall be included in its fair
market value.

(g) If an easement is abandoned pursuant to W.S.
1‑26‑515, the land shall revert to the original landowner
and the land shall be reclaimed pursuant to W.S. 1‑26‑714
and at the expense of the condemnor.

Section 2. This act applies to condemnation actions
initiated on or after July 1, 2025. Nothing in this act
shall be construed to impair any existing contracts.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0119